Arkansas, session 2025, SB480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-3-518(b)(1)(B)(vii)—(xiv), concerning
the investment of state funds in the State Treasury in securities and bank
certificates of deposit, are amended to read as follows:
(vii) Obligations issued by the State Board of
Education under authority of the Arkansas Constitution or applicable statutes
that are not general obligations of a municipality, county, or other
political subdivision of the state;
(viii) Warrants of a political subdivision or
municipality of the State of Arkansas having maturities not exceeding one (1)
year;
(ix) Prerefunded municipal bonds, if the principal
and interest of the municipal bonds are fully secured by the principal and
interest of a direct obligation of the United States Government;
(x) The sale of federal funds with a maturity of not
more than one (1) business day;
(xi) Demand, savings, or time deposits or accounts
of a depository institution chartered by the United States, a state of the
United States, or the District of Columbia if funds invested in the demand,
*JLL215*
03/17/2025 1:15:11 PM JLL215

SB480
savings, or time deposits or accounts are fully insured by a federal deposit
insurance agency;
(xii)(ix) Repurchase agreements that are fully
collateralized by securities stated in subdivisions (b)(1)(B)(ii)-(v) of this
section if the repurchase agreement provides for taking delivery of the
collateral directly or through an authorized custodian;
(xiii)(x) A securities or other interest in an open-
end type investment company or investment trust registered under the
Investment Company Act of 1940 and that is defined as a “money market fund”
under 17 C.F.R. § 270.2a-7 if:
(a) The portfolio of the investment company or
investment trust is limited principally to United States Government
obligations and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United
States Government obligations; and
(b) The investment company or investment trust
takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized
custodian; or
(xiv)(xi) As approved by the guidelines established
by the State Treasury investment policy approved by the State Board of
Finance, a corporate obligation with an investment grade rating of at least
BBB, A2, P2, or an equivalent rating as indicated by at least two (2) one (1)
nationally recognized statistical rating organizations.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-3-518(b)(3)(B), concerning the
investment of state funds in the State Treasury in securities and bank
certificates of deposit, is amended to read as follows:
(B) All purchases and sales of securities by the Treasurer
of State shall be made using a competitive procedure that:
(i) Is approved by the State Board of Finance; and
(ii) Has the goals of:
(a) Obtaining the optimal price and value for
the securities; and
(b) Not showing preference toward any
securities broker.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-3-518(d)(5), concerning the investment
03/17/2025 1:15:11 PM JLL215

SB480
of funds deposited into the State Treasury by state agencies, boards, and
commissions that were previously held as cash funds in a bank depository or
investment depository, is amended to read as follows:
(5) On the second business day that the State Treasury is open
after the twenty-fifth day of the month, the Treasurer of State shall
transfer or credit to the participants of the fund interest earned on all
State Treasury funds invested as authorized under this section during the
preceding month less the proportionate share of any assessments for the
expenses of administration.



























03/17/2025 1:15:11 PM JLL215